Massachusetts, session 194th, S2301.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 134 of Chapter 164 the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended by adding at the end after subsection (b) the following new subsection:-
(c ) (i) The DPU shall require investor-owned utilities, within three months of the
enactment of this section, to create a non-export interconnect permit tariff for customers of a
Municipal Aggregation. The investor-owned utility shall not charge a fee for the permit, and
shall not require studies or otherwise charge or delay issuance of the permit to a customer of a
Municipal Aggregation whose municipal government is seeking to build renewable Distributed
Energy Resources for the benefit of itself, its residents and/or business within its jurisdictional
boundaries who are enrolled in its Municipal Aggregation program.
(ii)The DPU shall approve or reject, within three months, the application of a
municipality it has certified as a Municipal Aggregation program to the Massachusetts clean
of 2

energy technology center for monies from the Massachusetts Renewable Energy Trust Fund,
established pursuant to Section 9 of Chapter 23J, to receive and expend moneys from the demand
side management system benefit charges or line charges in an amount not to exceed that
contributed by retail customers within said municipality or group of municipalities under Section
134 (b) of Chapter 164.
(iii) Failure to approve or reject after three months shall constitute approval. Rejection
shall state the specific provisions of the municipality's application that do not comply with state
policy, but shall not place conditions on the use of the funds, or the design of municipal energy
efficiency programs, provided that they are spent only on energy efficiency and conservation
measures. Furthermore, municipal governments with approved petitions, as a Municipal
Aggregator, in order to administer the energy efficiency funds shall be provided a pro rata share
of those funds within one year of approval.
of 2